Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 5 Industrial Road Program

§ 24-5-101.
Program in addition to any existing road program.

The road construction program contemplated by this act shall be known as “The Industrial Road Program”, which shall be in addition to and not as a substitute for any federal aid, primary, secondary or state-county road construction program or any other road program now in existence.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.1; 2011, ch. 129, § 301.

Cross references. —

As to state-county road construction program, see §

24-2-110

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “and farm-to-market road program” following “secondary.”

§ 24-5-102.
Board of county commissioners to incite procedure for industrial road.

A board of the county commissioners of any county may on its motion by resolution duly adopted where it deems the public interest so requires and a road-building emergency prevails incite the procedure for the establishment of an industrial road. The course and the point of termination of the road shall be determined by the board of the county commissioners. Before a board of the county commissioners of a county or counties can initiate the road program herein, it must have the cash money available for the project as described. Upon the adoption of such resolution by the board of the county commissioners of one (1) or more counties, it shall immediately notify the transportation commission of Wyoming of its intentions to establish a proposed industrial road.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.2; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-5-103.
Three viewers to examine industrial road proposal; appointment of viewers.

Three (3) viewers shall be appointed to examine into the expediency of the proposed industrial road and to make their report immediately. One (1) viewer shall be appointed by the board of the county commissioners at a regular or special meeting or the chairman of the board, if in his judgment an emergency exists, shall appoint a suitable and disinterested elector of the county, who may be a member of the board of the county commissioners; one (1) viewer shall be appointed by the member of the transportation commission in whose district the proposed industrial road is located, and the other viewer shall be appointed by the two (2) previously appointed viewers, which viewer shall not be a resident of the county in which the proposed industrial site is located.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.3; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-5-104.
Viewers to be sworn; scope of inquiry.

The persons so appointed shall be designated as viewers and they shall be sworn by some person or officer authorized by law to administer oaths before entering upon their duties, and they shall file their oaths in the office of the county clerk. They shall not be confined to the precise matter of the petition but may inquire or determine whether an industrial road in the vicinity is required.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 4, W.S. 1957, § 24-69.4.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

§ 24-5-105.
Viewers to consider certain standards.

In forming their judgment the viewers shall take into consideration both the public and private convenience, and also the expense of the proposed road.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.5.

§ 24-5-106.
Viewers to report to county commissioners.

The said viewers shall report in writing to the board of the county commissioners, whether or not, in their judgment, said proposed road is practicable, and ought to be established, and state the probable expense of the same including damages to the property owners along the line thereof, and such other matters as shall enable the board to act understandingly in the premises.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.6.

§ 24-5-107.
Compensation of viewers.

The board of the county commissioners shall allow said viewers such reasonable compensation for their services as they shall determine.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.7.

§ 24-5-108.
Department of transportation to survey, plat and record proposed road.

If upon considering and acting upon the report of the viewers the board of the county commissioners shall decide to lay out a road, they shall contact the department of transportation which shall provide an accurate survey and plat and record the same in the book provided in the county for that purpose; a copy of the plat and notes of the survey shall without unnecessary delay be filed in the office of the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.8; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-5-109.
Notice of proposed location of road; form of notice; publication; posting; registered mail.

Notice shall be published of the proposed location of such road by posting on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publishing once weekly for two (2) successive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county, which notice shall be in the following form:

TO WHOM IT MAY CONCERN: The Board of the County Commissioners have decided to locate a road commencing at in County, Wyoming, running thence (here describe in general terms the points and courses thereof), and terminating at All objections thereto or claims for damages by reason thereof must be filed in writing with the County Clerk of said county, before noon [12:00 p.m.] on the day of , (year), or such road will be established without reference to such objections or claims for damages. Dated County Clerk

Click to view

At the time the initial notices are published, the board of the county commissioners shall cause a copy of the above notice to be mailed by registered mail to all persons owning lands or any persons interested in lands over and across which said road is proposed to be located. The publication and posting of said notice shall be a legal and sufficient notice to all persons owning lands or claiming any interest in lands over which proposed road is to be located.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.9; 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2014 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices, see §

1-6-201

et seq.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “by posting on the county's official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publishing,” substituted “two (2)” for “three (3),” inserted “designated,” and substituted “of the county” for “published in said county, if any there be, and if no newspaper be published therein such notice shall be posted in at least three (3) public places along the line of such proposed industrial road.”.

§ 24-5-110.
Fixing date for filing objections or claims for damages.

The board of the county commissioners shall appoint a day not less than twenty (20) days after such publication or posted notice on or before which day all objections to the establishment of the industrial road and claim for damages by reason thereof shall be filed with the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.10.

§ 24-5-111.
Failure to file objections or claims for damages deemed waiver.

No objections or claims for damages shall be filed or made after the noon [12:00 p.m.] of the day fixed for filing the same. If no objections or claim for damages are filed, all such claims shall be deemed to have been waived and are barred.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.11.

§ 24-5-112.
Hearing continued until matter disposed of when objections filed.

If objections to the establishment of the industrial road or if any claim for damages is filed, a further hearing may be continued by the board until the matter can be disposed of.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 12; W.S. 1957 § 24-69.12.

§ 24-5-113.
Board to appoint appraisers to fix amount of damages; report.

When claims for damages are filed at the next regular meeting or special meeting of the board of the county commissioners, the board shall appoint three (3) disinterested electors of the county as appraisers to view the ground on a day as fixed by the board and they shall report their findings in the matter and file the report in writing with the county clerk within ten (10) days thereafter, fixing the amount of damages sustained by the claimants.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.13.

§ 24-5-114.
Notification to appraisers of appointment; contents.

The county clerk shall cause each of said appraisers to be notified of his appointment stating in said notice first, the names of all appraisers; second, the names of all claims for damage on account of the location of the industrial road with the amount of damages asked by each claimant; third, stating when the report must be filed. The county clerk shall prepare suitable blanks for such notice, for the oath of appraisers, and for the report, a proper number of which shall be forwarded by him to them.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 14; W.S. 1957 § 24-69.14.

§ 24-5-115.
Duties of appraisers; report to county commissioners; compensation.

The said appraisers shall within seven (7) days after receiving notice of their appointment meet at some convenient place on the line of the proposed industrial road, take and administer to each other an oath or affirmation to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties. They shall view the ground so far as they shall deem it necessary and fix the damages sustained by each claimant, after allowing for all benefits that may accrue to each claimant. By reason of the location of the industrial road they, or a majority of the appraisers shall make a report in writing to the board of the county commissioners within seven (7) days relating that they were sworn and affirmed as aforesaid and fixing the damages sustained by each claimant, if any, after allowing and deducting for benefits and where they have disallowed claims for damages they shall so state in their report. The said appraisers shall receive for their compensation such reasonable sum as the board of the county commissioners shall allow.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.15.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

Cited

in

TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 24-5-116.
Road established; awards paid; certificate of legal description of property to be filed.

At the next meeting of the board of the county commissioners after receipt of the report of the appraisers, or as soon thereafter, as may be practicable, the board may hear testimony and consider petitions for and remonstrances against the establishment of such industrial road. In case there shall be no claim for damages filed, they shall act as speedily as possible in the matter. The board may increase or diminish the damages allowed by the appraisers. The amount of damages awarded, if any, shall immediately be paid to the person or persons entitled thereto or deposited with the county clerk for delivery, which payment shall be without prejudice to the right of such person or persons to appeal to the district court as provided by law. When the road has been established and the award paid by the board of the county commissioners to the person or persons entitled thereto or deposited with the county clerk, the highway authorities and the contractors and employees may take possession and exercise full control of the lands within the right-of-way of the road so established. A certificate, authorized by the board of the county commissioners and signed by its chairman, setting forth the legal description of the property taken shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk and indexed in like manner and with like effect as if it were a conveyance of the easement or right-of-way from said owners to the county.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.16.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

§ 24-5-117.
Construction under supervision of director of department of transportation; division of construction costs.

The transportation commission shall cooperate with the respective counties of the state in the construction of the industrial road program. All work under the industrial road program shall be performed under the immediate control and supervision of the director of the department of transportation or his authorized representative and in accordance with plans and specifications prepared by the director or the chief engineer, which work in the county is known as its industrial road program and shall be promptly commenced upon request of its board of the county commissioners, which request shall contain the pledge of the county for contribution as specified. The term “construction” as used in this section shall include construction, reconstruction, surveys, mapping, right-of-way costs, bridges, culverts and fencing, in all of which whenever and to the extent possible the department of transportation shall use existing grades, bridges and other physical items or facilities in order to minimize or avoid more costly construction. Fifty percent (50%) of all expense shall be paid by the department of transportation, and the other fifty percent (50%) of the construction costs shall be paid by the board of the county commissioners of the county or counties concerned.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.17; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-5-118.
Industrial road program account.

The transportation commission shall set aside and appropriate out of funds in their possession or under their control, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000.00) at the beginning of each biennium to be placed in an account known as the industrial road program account within the highway fund. All funds not used during each biennium shall lapse and be returned to the general account of the highway fund.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.18; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 51, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state highway fund, see §

24-1-119

.

§ 24-5-119.
Counties to match state funds; maximum amount of county expenditures; exception; acquisition of right-of-way.

Any county participating in the industrial road program shall match money equally with money set aside pursuant to W.S.

24-5-118

. These funds may be derived from any funds in the respective county budget now available or any monies which may subsequently be budgeted for this program, provided, however, no county shall expend on this program in excess of two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) each and every biennium. This act shall not apply to any project having a total cost of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) total. The board of the county commissioners of each county shall acquire the right-of-way for any industrial road, the expense of which shall be charged against the industrial road program.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.19; Laws 1963, ch. 17, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 51, § 1; 2009, ch. 14, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)” for “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00).”

§ 24-5-120.
Industrial road to be designated as county road.

The industrial road, when completed, shall be designated as a county road and shall be the county responsibility as to maintenance and repair.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.20.

Cross references. —

As to designation of public highways, see §

24-1-101

.

§ 24-5-121.
Priority of road projects.

In the event there are more county applications than the transportation commission has money available, the transportation commission shall determine which road project shall have priority based on these qualifications:

Priority of notice from the board of the county commissioners;

County money actually available for the project and deposited with the transportation commission;

Traffic count;

Number of people project will service as evidenced by information furnished by the county or counties interested in the project;

Tax value of the area served by the industrial road as shown on the assessment rolls of the county or counties involved in the project from information furnished by the county assessor of said county or counties.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.21; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 24-5-122.
Counties may associate on road project.

Two (2) or more counties may associate themselves together in connection with any industrial road project.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 136, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 24-69.22.

Cross references. —

As to bridges between counties, see §

24-1-114

.